Wyoming, session 2025, SF0128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-103(a)(i)(E) and 39-15-105(a)
by creating a new paragraph (xi) are amended to read:

39-15-103. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

SF0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0646
(i) Except as provided by W.S. 39-15-105, there
is levied an excise tax upon:

(E) Except to the extent sales of
electricity are exempt under W.S. 39-15-104(a)(xi), the
sales price paid to public utilities as defined in W.S.
37-1-101 through 37-3-114 and to persons furnishing gas,
electricity or heat for domestic, industrial or commercial
consumption;

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

(xi) Sales of electricity for domestic,
industrial or commercial consumption.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0128